South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1038.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Religious Liberty Day SECTION 1.    Chapter 3, Title 53 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 53-3-340.    The first day of March of each year is designated as "Religious Liberty Day" in South Carolina. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________